Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 1. Persons Subject to Tax; Returns and Payment; Credits.
Sec. 43.20.044.
Exploration credits.

A taxpayer may apply as a credit against the tax levied under this chapter

the exploration incentive credit authorized by AS 27.30;

an alternative tax credit for oil and gas exploration earned by the taxpayer under AS

43.55.025

for exploration expenditures incurred for work performed on or after July 1, 2016.

In a tax year in which a taxpayer applies against the tax levied under this chapter the exploration incentive credit authorized by AS 27.30, the commissioner shall require the taxpayer to submit the accounting of mining operation activities form required by AS

27.30.030(b)

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 86 SLA 1995; am § 4 ch 3 SSSLA 2017)

Cross references. —

For provision providing that the 2017 amendment to subsection (a) applies to a tax credit “earned under AS 43.55.026 for work performed on or after July 1, 2016”, see sec. 33, ch. 3, SSSLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 28, 2017, added (a)(2), and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

Under § 6,
ch. 86, SLA 1995, this section “is retroactive to January 1, 1995 and applies to activities that qualify for the exploration incentive credit authorized by
AS 27.30 that are undertaken after May 15, 1995.”

Sec. 43.20.045.
Proration of part-year resident and nonresident individual credits. [Repealed, § 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980.]

Sec. 43.20.046.
Gas storage facility tax credit.

A person that is an owner of a gas storage facility described in (b) of this section that commences commercial operation after December 31, 2010, and before January 1, 2016, may apply a refundable credit against a tax liability that may be imposed on the person under this chapter for the taxable year in which the gas storage facility commences commercial operation. The tax credit under this section shall be an amount equal to $1.50 for each 1,000 cubic feet of working gas storage capacity that is certified under AS

31.05.032

less any amount of credit received under this section taken in earlier tax years for that capacity. The total amount of the credit that may be received for a single gas storage facility under this section may not exceed the lesser of $15,000,000 or 25 percent of the costs incurred to establish the gas storage facility. The tax credit in this section is in addition to any other credit under this chapter for which the person is eligible.

A gas storage facility qualifying for the credit in this section

must have a working gas storage capacity of at least 500,000,000 cubic feet of gas other than cushion gas;

must have a minimum withdrawal capability of 10,000,000 cubic feet a day as certified by the Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission under AS

31.05.032

;

may not have been in operation as a gas storage facility before January 1, 2011;

must be regulated under AS 42.05 as a utility and be available to furnish the service of natural gas storage to the public for compensation; in this paragraph, “service of natural gas storage” has the meaning given in AS

42.05.990

; and

if located on state land and leased or subject to a lease under AS

38.05.180

, must be in compliance with the terms of the lease.

To claim the credit, the person shall submit to the department a copy of the certification of working gas storage capacity and withdrawal capability issued under AS

31.05.032

, the date that the gas storage facility commenced commercial operation, and other information required by the department. A person applying the credit against a liability under this chapter shall claim the credit on the person’s return.

A person entitled to a tax credit under this section that is greater than the person’s tax liability under this chapter may request a refund in the amount of the unused portion of the tax credit.

Subject to the requirements in AS

43.55.028

, the department may use either available money in the oil and gas tax credit fund established in AS

43.55.028

or, subject to appropriation by the legislature, money disbursed to the commissioner for refunds under AS 43.55.028 from the Alaska Tax Credit Certificate Bond Corporation reserve fund established in AS

37.18.040

, or both, to make the refund applied for under (d) of this section in whole or in part if the department finds that, after application of all available tax credits, the claimant’s total tax liability under this chapter for the calendar year in which the claim is made is zero.

For the purpose of determining the amount of the credit under this section, the working gas storage capacity on which the credit is based shall be the capacity certified by the Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission under AS

31.05.032

.

A person may not receive a credit under this section for the acquisition of a gas storage facility for which a credit has been granted under this section.

If the gas storage facility for which a credit was received under this section ceases commercial operation during the nine calendar years immediately following the calendar year in which the gas storage facility commences commercial operation, the tax liability under this chapter of the person who claimed the credit shall be increased. The amount of the increase in tax liability

shall be determined and assessed for the taxable year in which the gas storage facility ceases commercial operation, regardless of whether the gas storage facility subsequently resumes commercial operation; and

is equal to the total amount of the credit taken multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is the difference between 10 and the number of calendar years for which the gas storage facility was eligible for a tax credit under this section and the denominator of which is 10.

The issuance of a refund under this section does not limit the department’s ability to later audit or adjust the claim if the department determines, as a result of the audit, that the person that claimed the credit was not entitled to the amount of the credit. The tax liability of the person receiving the credit under this chapter is increased by the amount of the credit that exceeds that to which the person was entitled. If the tax liability is increased under this subsection, the increase bears interest under AS

43.05.225

from the date the refund was issued.

A person claiming a tax credit under this section for a gas storage facility that ceases commercial operation within nine calendar years immediately following the calendar year in which the gas storage facility commences commercial operation shall notify the department in writing of the date the gas storage facility ceased commercial operation. The notice must be filed with the return for the taxable year in which the gas storage facility ceases commercial operation.

A refund under this section does not bear interest.

In this section, “ceases commercial operation,” “commences commercial operation,” “gas storage facility,” and “working gas storage capacity” have the meanings given in AS

31.05.032

.

History.

(§ 12 ch 16 SLA 2010; am § 10 ch 4 4SSLA 2016; am § 3 ch 33 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (e), inserted “Subject to the requirements in AS

43.55.028(j)

, the” at the beginning; deleted “(1) the claimant does not have an outstanding liability to the state for unpaid delinquent taxes under this title; and (2)” preceding “after application”; deleted the last sentence, which read “In this subsection, ‘unpaid delinquent tax’ means an amount of tax for which the department has issued an assessment that has not been paid and, if contested, has not been finally resolved in the taxpayer’s favor.”, and made related changes.

The 2018 amendment, effective June 21, 2018, in (e), substituted “AS

43.55.028

” for “AS

43.55.028(j)

” following “the requirements in”, inserted “either” preceding “available money”, inserted “or, subject to appropriation by the legislature, money disbursed to the commissioner for refunds under AS

43.55.028

from the Alaska Tax Credit Certificate Bond Corporation reserve fund established in AS

37.18.040

, or both,” preceding “to make the refund”.

Editor's notes. —

Under sec. 35(a),
ch. 4, 4SSLA 2016, the 2016 amendment to subsection (e) applies “to a purchase applied for on or after January 1, 2017.”

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for ch. 33, SLA 2018 (HB 331), which amended this section, see 2018 House Journal 2341 — 2343.

Sec. 43.20.047.
Liquefied natural gas storage facility tax credit.

A person that is an owner of a liquefied natural gas storage facility described in (b) of this section that commences commercial operation before January 1, 2020, may apply a refundable credit against a tax liability that may be imposed on the person under this chapter or receive the amount of the credit in the form of a payment for the taxable year in which the liquefied natural gas storage facility commences commercial operation. The tax credit or payment under this section may not exceed the lesser of $15,000,000 or 50 percent of the costs incurred to establish or expand the liquefied natural gas storage facility. The tax credit in this section is in addition to any other credit under this chapter for which the person is eligible.

To qualify for the credit in this section, a liquefied natural gas storage facility

must have a liquefied natural gas storage volume of not less than 25,000 gallons of liquefied natural gas, or, if the credit is claimed for an expansion, the expansion must have increased the capacity of an existing liquefied natural gas storage facility by more than 25,000 gallons;

may not have been in operation as a liquefied natural gas storage facility before January 1, 2011, unless the tax credit in this section is based on the expansion of the liquefied natural gas storage facility after December 31, 2011;

must be regulated under AS 42.05 as a utility and be available to furnish the service of liquefied natural gas storage to customers, utilities, or industrial facilities; in this paragraph, “service of liquefied natural gas storage” has the meaning given in AS

42.05.990

;

if located on state land and leased or subject to a lease under AS 38.05, must be in compliance with the terms of the lease; and

must have commenced commercial operation on or before the date the person takes a credit under (a) of this section or applies for a payment under (a) of this section.

To claim the credit or request a payment, a person shall submit to the department a certification of the capacity of the liquefied natural gas storage facility measured in gallons or the capacity of an expansion to an existing liquefied natural gas storage facility measured in gallons, the date that the liquefied natural gas storage facility commenced commercial operation, the date that any expansion to the liquefied natural gas storage facility commenced commercial operation, and other information required by the department.

A person applying the credit under this section against a liability under this chapter shall claim the credit on the person’s return. A person entitled to a tax credit under this section that is greater than the person’s tax liability under this chapter may request a refund or payment in the amount of the unused portion of the tax credit.

Subject to the requirements in AS

43.55.028

, the department may use either money available in the oil and gas tax credit fund established in AS

43.55.028

or, subject to appropriation by the legislature, money disbursed to the commissioner for refunds and payments under AS 43.55.028 from the Alaska Tax Credit Certificate Bond Corporation reserve fund established in AS

37.18.040

, or both, to make a refund or payment under (d) of this section in whole or in part if the department finds that, after application of all available tax credits, the claimant’s total tax liability under this chapter for the calendar year in which the claim is made is zero.

For the purpose of determining the amount of the credit under this section, the costs incurred to establish a liquefied natural gas storage facility or to expand a liquefied natural gas storage facility shall be submitted to the department with verification by an independent certified public accountant licensed in the state. The volume of working liquefied natural gas storage or volume of the expansion to an existing liquefied natural gas storage facility shall be verified by a professional engineer licensed in the state with relevant experience.

A person may not receive a credit under this section for the acquisition of a liquefied natural gas storage facility for which a credit has been taken under this section.

If the liquefied natural gas storage facility for which a credit was received under this section ceases commercial operation during the nine calendar years immediately following the calendar year in which the liquefied natural gas storage facility commences commercial operation, the tax liability under this chapter of the person who claimed the credit shall be increased, and a person not subject to the tax under this chapter that received a payment under (d) and (e) of this section shall be liable to the state in the amount determined in this subsection. The amount of the increase in tax liability or liability to the state

for a person subject to the tax under this chapter, shall be determined and assessed for the taxable year in which the liquefied natural gas storage facility ceases commercial operation, regardless of whether the liquefied natural gas storage facility subsequently resumes commercial operation;

for a person not subject to the tax due under this chapter, shall be determined and assessed as of December 31 of the calendar year in which the liquefied natural gas storage facility ceases commercial operation, regardless of whether the liquefied natural gas storage facility subsequently resumes commercial operation; and

is equal to the total amount of the credit taken or received as a payment under (d) of this section, as applicable, multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is the difference between 10 and the number of calendar years for which the liquefied natural gas storage facility was eligible for a tax credit under this section and the denominator of which is 10.

The issuance of a refund under this section does not limit the department’s ability to later audit or adjust the claim if the department determines, as a result of the audit, that the person that claimed the credit was not entitled to the amount of the credit. The tax liability of the person receiving the credit under this section is increased by the amount of the credit that exceeds that to which the person was entitled. If the tax liability is increased under this subsection, the increase bears interest at the rate set by AS

43.05.225

from the date the refund was issued.

A person claiming a tax credit under this section for a liquefied natural gas storage facility that ceases commercial operation within nine calendar years immediately following the calendar year in which the liquefied natural gas storage facility commences commercial operation shall notify the department in writing of the date the liquefied natural gas storage facility ceased commercial operation. The notice must be filed with the return for the taxable year in which the liquefied natural gas storage facility ceases commercial operation.

A refund under this section does not bear interest.

In this section,

“ceases commercial operation” means that the liquefied natural gas storage facility fails to add or withdraw 20 percent or more of its working capacity of liquefied natural gas during a calendar year after the calendar year in which the liquefied natural gas storage facility commences commercial operation;

“commences commercial operation” means the first input of liquefied natural gas into a liquefied natural gas storage facility for purposes other than testing;

“liquefied natural gas storage facility” has the meaning given in AS

42.05.990

.

History.

(§ 9 ch 51 SLA 2012; am § 11 ch 4 4SSLA 2016; am § 4 ch 33 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (e), inserted “Subject to the requirements in AS

43.55.028(j)

, the” at the beginning; deleted “(1) the claimant does not have an outstanding liability to the state for unpaid delinquent taxes under this title; and (2)” preceding “after application”; deleted the last sentence, which read “In this subsection, ‘unpaid delinquent tax’ means an amount of tax for which the department has issued an assessment that has not been paid and, if contested, has not been finally resolved in the taxpayer’s favor.”, and made related changes.

The 2018 amendment, effective June 21, 2018, in (e), substituted “AS

43.55.028

” for “AS

43.55.028(j)

” following “the requirements in”, inserted “either” preceding “money available”, inserted “or, subject to appropriation by the legislature, money disbursed to the commissioner for refunds and payments under AS

43.55.028

from the Alaska Tax Credit Certificate Bond Corporation reserve fund established in AS

37.18.040

, or both,” preceding “to make a refund”.

Editor's notes. —

Under sec. 35(a),
ch. 4, 4SSLA 2016, the 2016 amendment to subsection (e) applies "to a purchase applied for on or after January 1, 2017."

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for ch. 33, SLA 2018 (HB 331), which amended this section, see 2018 House Journal 2341 — 2343.

Sec. 43.20.048.
Veteran employment tax credit.

A taxpayer that hires a veteran and employs the veteran in the state is entitled to a credit under this section against the tax due under this chapter. The taxpayer is entitled to the credit for each veteran whose employment qualifies under this section.

To qualify as a veteran for the purposes of the credit under this section, the veteran must have been unemployed for more than four weeks immediately preceding the date employment begins and must have been discharged or released from military service

not more than 10 years before the date employment begins in the case of a veteran who is a disabled veteran; or

not more than two years before the date employment begins in the case of a veteran who is not a disabled veteran.

The amount of credit that may be applied by a taxpayer for each qualifying veteran under this section is,

for a veteran employed in the state for 1,560 hours or more during the 12 consecutive months immediately following the date the veteran is first employed,

$3,000 for a disabled veteran; and

$2,000 for a veteran who is not disabled;

for a veteran employed in the state for 500 hours or more in a seasonal position during the three consecutive months immediately following the date the veteran is first employed by an employer in a seasonal position, $1,000; an employer that hires a veteran for a seasonal position may take the credit under this paragraph only for the first season in which the employer employs the veteran.

The tax credit under this section may be applied against the tax due under this chapter for the first tax year ending on or after the end of the employment period described in (c) of this section. The credit may not be used to reduce a person’s tax liability under this chapter below zero for any tax year, and any credit or portion of a credit not used under this section may be applied in a later tax year.

A taxpayer shall keep a record of the name of the veteran employee whose employment is the basis for a credit under this section, documentation supporting the employee’s qualification as a veteran or disabled veteran, and the veteran employee’s hours employed and period of employment. The department may adopt a regulation that lists the documentation that must be maintained to support a claim that an employee qualifies as a veteran or disabled veteran for purposes of this section.

In this section,

“disabled veteran” has the meaning given in AS

39.25.159

;

“seasonal position” means employment that is not intended to continue through an entire calendar year but recurs annually;

“veteran” means an individual who served in and was honorably discharged from the

armed forces of the United States, including a reserve unit of the armed forces of the United States; or

Alaska Territorial Guard, the Alaska Army National Guard, the Alaska Air National Guard, or the Alaska Naval Militia.

History.

(§ 3 ch 68 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

43.20.047

and renumbered in 2012.

Sec. 43.20.049.
Qualified oil and gas service industry expenditure credit.

For a tax year beginning after December 31, 2013, a taxpayer may apply a credit against the tax due under this chapter for a qualified oil and gas service industry expenditure incurred in the state. The total amount of credit a taxpayer may receive in a tax year may not exceed the lesser of 10 percent of qualified oil and gas service industry expenditures incurred in the state during the tax year or $10,000,000.

A taxpayer may not apply more than $10,000,000 in tax credits under this section in a tax year. A tax credit or portion of a tax credit under this section may not be used to reduce the taxpayer’s tax liability under this chapter below zero. Any unused tax credit or portion of a tax credit under this section may be applied in later tax years, except that any unused tax credit or portion of a tax credit may not be carried forward for more than five tax years immediately following the tax year in which the qualified oil and gas service industry expenditures were incurred.

An expenditure that is the basis of the credit under this section may not be the basis for

a deduction against the tax levied under this chapter;

a credit or deduction under another provision of this title; or

any federal credit claimed under this title.

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of AS

40.25.100(a)

or AS

43.05.230(e)

, for a year that three or more taxpayers claim a tax credit under this section, the department may publish the aggregated amount of tax credits claimed under this section and a description of the qualified oil and gas service industry expenditures that were the basis for a tax credit under this section.

In this section,

“manufacture” means to perform substantial industrial operations in the state to transform raw material into tangible personal property with a useful life of three years or more for use in the exploration for, development of, or production of oil or gas deposits;

“modification” means an adjustment, equipping, or other alteration to existing tangible personal property that has a useful life of three years or more and is for use in the exploration for, development of, or production of oil or gas deposits; “modification” does not include minor product alterations or inventory activities;

“qualified oil and gas service industry expenditure” means an expenditure directly attributable to an in-state manufacture or in-state modification of tangible personal property used in the exploration for, development of, or production of oil or gas deposits, but does not include components or equipment used for or in the process of that manufacturing or modification.

History.

(§ 3 ch 10 SLA 2013)

Sec. 43.20.050.
Taxpayer liable. [Repealed, § 13 ch 70 SLA 1975.]

Sec. 43.20.051.
[Renumbered as AS 43.20.141.]

Sec. 43.20.052.
Credit for the in-state manufacture of urea, ammonia, or gas-to-liquid products.

A taxpayer that owns an interest, either directly or through a partnership or limited liability company, in an in-state processing facility whose primary function is the manufacturing and sale of urea, ammonia, or gas-to-liquid products to third parties in arm’s length transactions is entitled to receive a credit under this section against the tax due under this chapter. The credit under this section is equal to the percentage of the amount of royalty paid under AS

38.05.135

on natural gas from a state lease that is delivered in the taxable year of the taxpayer for use at the in-state processing facility equal to the percentage of the ownership interest held by the taxpayer in the in-state processing facility.

A tax credit or portion of a tax credit under this section may not be used to reduce a taxpayer’s tax liability under this chapter below zero. An unused tax credit or portion of a tax credit received under this section may not be carried forward for use in a taxable year of the taxpayer after the taxable year in which the credit is earned.

To claim a credit under this section, the taxpayer shall

report to the department the name of each lessee delivering natural gas for use at the in-state processing facility, the identification and quantity of natural gas from each state lease that is the source of the natural gas, the ownership percentage of the taxpayer in the in-state processing facility, and the price for the natural gas established in a contract between the in-state processing facility and the lessee delivering the natural gas; and

demonstrate to the department that the taxpayer, to the maximum extent possible,

hires qualified residents from throughout the state for the management, engineering, construction, operation, and maintenance of, and other positions for, the in-state processing facility;

establishes hiring facilities in the state or uses existing hiring facilities in the state; and

uses, as far as practicable, the job centers and associated services operated by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development or an Internet-based labor exchange system operated by the state.

In this section, “gas-to-liquid product” has the meaning given in AS

38.05.180

(ll).

History.

(§ 2 ch 58 SLA 2016)

Delayed repeal of section. —

Under secs. 3 and 6, ch. 58, SLA 2016, this section is repealed January 1, 2024.

Effective dates. —

Section 5,
ch. 58, SLA 2016, makes this section effective July 1, 2017.

Editor's notes. —

Under sec. 4, ch. 58, SLA 2016, this section “applies to the amount of royalty paid under AS

38.05.135

on natural gas from a state lease that is delivered for use at an in-state processing facility whose primary function is the manufacturing and sale of urea, ammonia, or gas-to-liquid products to third parties in arm's length transactions on or after July 1, 2017, and before January 1, 2024.”

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 4, 4SSLA 2016 (HB 247) proposing changes to oil and gas tax credits and oil and gas taxes, see 2016 House Journal 1437 — 1439.

Sec. 43.20.052.
Credit for the in-state manufacture of urea, ammonia, or gas-to-liquid products.

History.

[§ 2 ch 58 SLA 2016; Repealed, § 3 ch 58 SLA 2016.]

Sec. 43.20.053.
Qualified in-state oil refinery infrastructure expenditures tax credit.

A taxpayer that owns an in-state oil refinery whose primary function is the manufacturing and sale of refined petroleum products to third parties in arm’s length transactions may apply a credit against the tax due under this chapter for a qualified infrastructure expenditure incurred in the state for a tax year beginning after December 31, 2014, and before January 1, 2020. The total amount of credit a taxpayer may receive under this section may not exceed the lesser of 40 percent of qualified infrastructure expenditures incurred in the state during the tax year or $10,000,000 for each in-state refinery for which qualified expenditures are incurred.

A taxpayer applying the credit under this section against a liability under this chapter shall claim the credit on the taxpayer’s return. A tax credit or portion of a tax credit under this section may not be used to reduce the taxpayer’s tax liability under this chapter below zero. Any unused tax credit or portion of a tax credit under this section may be carried forward to the five tax years immediately following the tax year in which the qualified infrastructure expenditures were incurred.

An expenditure that is the basis of the credit under this section may not be the basis for

a deduction against the tax levied under this chapter;

a credit or deduction under another provision of this title; or

any federal credit claimed under this title.

A person entitled to a tax credit under this section that is greater than the person’s tax liability under this chapter may request a refund or payment in the amount of the unused portion of the tax credit.

Subject to the requirements in AS

43.55.028

, the department may use either money available in the oil and gas tax credit fund established in AS

43.55.028

or, subject to appropriation by the legislature, money disbursed to the commissioner for refunds and payments under AS 43.55.028 from the Alaska Tax Credit Certificate Bond Corporation reserve fund established in AS

37.18.040

, or both, to make a refund or payment under (d) of this section in whole or in part if the department finds that, after application of all available tax credits, the claimant’s total tax liability under this chapter for the calendar year in which the claim is made is zero.

A refund under this section does not bear interest.

If an oil refinery ceases commercial operation during the nine calendar years immediately following the calendar year in which a credit under this section was received, regardless of whether commercial operation later resumes, the taxpayer’s tax liability under this chapter will be increased. The tax liability increase is equal to the total amount of credit taken multiplied by a fraction

the numerator of which is the difference between 10 and the number of calendar years for which the oil refinery was eligible for a credit under this section; and

the denominator of which is 10.

A person claiming a tax credit under this section for an oil refinery that ceases commercial operation or is sold during the nine calendar years immediately following the calendar year in which a credit under this section was received shall notify the department in writing of the date the oil refinery ceased commercial operation or was sold. The notice must be filed with the return for the tax year in which the oil refinery ceases commercial operation or was sold.

The issuance of a refund under this section does not limit the department’s ability to later audit or adjust the claim as provided in AS 43.05 if the department determines that the taxpayer claiming the credit was not entitled to the amount of the credit.

In this section,

“modification” means an adjustment or other alteration to existing tangible personal property that has a useful life of three years or more;

“qualified infrastructure expenditure” means an expenditure for the in-state purchase, installation, or modification of tangible personal property for the in-state manufacture or in-state transport of refined petroleum products, or petroleum-based feedstock;

“refined petroleum products” means separate marketable elements, compounds, or mixtures of oil in liquid form, including gasoline, diesel, jet fuel, gas oil, heating oil, and kerosene;

[Repealed, § 33, ch. 4, 4SSLA 2016.]

History.

(§ 3 ch 108 SLA 2014; am §§ 12, 33 ch 4 4SSLA 2016; am § 5 ch 33 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (e), inserted “Subject to the requirements in AS

43.55.028(j)

, the” at the beginning; deleted “(1) the claimant does not have an outstanding liability to the state for unpaid delinquent taxes under this title; and (2)” preceding “after application”; repealed (j)(4).

The 2018 amendment, effective June 21, 2018, in (e), substituted “AS

43.55.028

” for “AS

43.55.028(j)

” following “the requirements in”, inserted “either” preceding “money available”, inserted “or, subject to appropriation by the legislature, money disbursed to the commissioner for refunds and payments under AS

43.55.028

from the Alaska Tax Credit Certificate Bond Corporation reserve fund established in AS

37.18.040

, or both,” preceding “to make a refund”.

Editor's notes. —

Under sec. 35(a),
ch. 4, 4SSLA 2016, the 2016 amendment to subsection (e) applies "to a purchase applied for on or after January 1, 2017."

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for ch. 33, SLA 2018 (HB 331), which amended this section, see 2018 House Journal 2341 — 2343.

Sec. 43.20.060.
Direct allocation. [Repealed, § 13 ch 70 SLA 1975.]

Sec. 43.20.061.
Credit for taxes paid another state. [Repealed, § 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980.]

Sec. 43.20.065.
[Renumbered as AS 43.20.142.]

Sec. 43.20.070.
Employees of interstate carriers. [Repealed, § 13 ch 70 SLA 1975.]

Sec. 43.20.071.
[Renumbered as AS 43.20.143.]

Sec. 43.20.072.
[Renumbered as AS 43.20.144.]

Sec. 43.20.073.
[Renumbered as AS 43.20.145.]